Maryland, session 2026, HB0559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–402.
(a) There is a Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account in the Transportation
Trust Fund.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0559*

HOUSE BILL 559
(b) All revenues collected from the following, after deductions provided by law,
shall be credited to the Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account:
(1) All of the motor vehicle fuel tax;
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, two–thirds of the revenue from
the vehicle titling tax, excluding revenue attributable to:
(i) A vehicle titling tax rate in excess of 6%; or
(ii) The vehicle titling tax imposed on rental vehicles under §
13–809(c)(1)(ii) of this article;
(3) Except for revenues collected under Title 13, Subtitle 9, Parts III and
IV of this article, vehicle registration fees;
(4) The revenue disbursed to this Account under § 2–614 of the
Tax – General Article; and
(5) 80% of the funds distributed on short–term vehicle rentals under §
2–1302.1 of the Tax – General Article to the Transportation Trust Fund from the sales and
use tax.
(c) For fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, revenue credited to the
Account shall be used as provided in § 3–216 of this article.
8–403.
(a) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, for fiscal years 2020 through 2023,
capital grants shall be appropriated from the Transportation Trust Fund as provided in §
3–216 of this article based on the following calculations:
(1) An amount equal to 8.3% of funds credited to the Gasoline and Motor
Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to Baltimore City;
(2) An amount equal to 3.2% of funds credited to the Gasoline and Motor
Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the counties to be distributed as provided
in § 8–404 of this subtitle; and
(3) An amount equal to 2.0% of funds credited to the Gasoline and Motor
Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the municipalities to be distributed as
provided in § 8–405 of this subtitle.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, capital grants shall be appropriated
from the Transportation Trust Fund as provided in § 3–216 of this article based on the
following calculations:

HOUSE BILL 559 3
(1) For fiscal year 2024:
(i) An amount equal to 9.5% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to Baltimore City;
(ii) An amount equal to 3.7% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the counties to be distributed as
provided in § 8–404 of this subtitle; and
(iii) An amount equal to 2.4% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the municipalities to be
distributed as provided in § 8–405 of this subtitle;
(2) For fiscal year 2025:
(i) An amount equal to 11% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to Baltimore City;
(ii) An amount equal to 4.3% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the counties to be distributed as
provided in § 8–404 of this subtitle; and
(iii) An amount equal to 2.7% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the municipalities to be
distributed as provided in § 8–405 of this subtitle; AND
(3) For fiscal year 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER:
(i) An amount equal to 12.2% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to Baltimore City;
(ii) An amount equal to 4.8% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the counties to be distributed as
provided in § 8–404 of this subtitle; and
(iii) An amount equal to 3.0% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the municipalities to be
distributed as provided in § 8–405 of this subtitle[;
(4) For fiscal year 2027:
(i) An amount equal to 12.2% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to Baltimore City;
(ii) An amount equal to 4.8% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the counties to be distributed as
provided in § 8–404 of this subtitle; and

HOUSE BILL 559
(iii) An amount equal to 3.0% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the municipalities to be
distributed as provided in § 8–405 of this subtitle; and
(5) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter:
(i) An amount equal to 9.5% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to Baltimore City;
(ii) An amount equal to 3.7% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the counties to be distributed as
provided in § 8–404 of this subtitle; and
(iii) An amount equal to 2.4% of funds credited to the Gasoline and
Motor Vehicle Revenue Account shall be appropriated to the municipalities to be
distributed as provided in § 8–405 of this subtitle].
(c) The capital grants made under this subtitle shall be appropriated only if all
debt service requirements and departmental operating expenses have been funded and
sufficient funds are available to fund the capital program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.